Wyoming, session 2025, HB0097.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-1-618(b)(vi), 18-3-402(a)(xxvi),
19-13-104(d)(vi), 19-13-105 by creating a new subsection
(e), 19-13-501(a)(i), (iv)(A) and by creating a new
paragraph (vi) and 19-13-502(c) and (d) are amended to
read:
9-1-618. Agents to be safeguarded as peace officers;
general assistance to state, county or local authorities;
investigative duties.
(b) The division shall investigate:
(vi) Conveyances, leases and leasehold interests
as defined by 19-13-501(a)(i), within or near designated
critical infrastructure zones. as reported by county clerks
in accordance with W.S. 19-13-501 and 19-13-502. The
division may investigate whether the any conveyance, lease
and leasehold interest reported by county clerks in
accordance with W.S. 19-13-501 and 19-13-502 may result in
a threat to national or state security or whether the
conveyance, lease and leasehold interest involves a
designated country or person as defined by W.S.
19-13-501(a)(iv). The attorney general or, with the
attorney general's approval, the division may subpoena
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0097
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
witnesses, compel their attendance and require the
production of records and other evidence to determine:
(A) Whether a conveyance, lease and
leasehold interest within located up to five (5) miles of
from a designated critical infrastructure zone threatens
national or state security;
(B) Whether a conveyance, lease and
leasehold interest involves a designated country or person
as defined by W.S. 19-13-501(a)(iv);
(C) The actual identity of a party to a
conveyance, lease and leasehold interest within located up
to five (5) miles of from a designated critical
infrastructure zone.
18-3-402. Duties generally.
(a) The county clerk shall:
(xxvi) Report all conveyances, within five (5)
miles of a designated critical infrastructure zone as
defined by W.S. 19-13-501(a)(i), to the director of the
office of homeland security and the division of criminal
investigation in accordance with W.S. 19-13-501 and
19-13-502.
19-13-104. Powers of governor generally; director,
office of homeland security.
(d) The position of the director, office of homeland
security is created in the governor's office and shall be
appointed by the governor. He shall be responsible to the
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0097
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
governor and may be removed by the governor as provided in
W.S. 9-1-202. The director shall:
(vi) Consult the governor and assist the
attorney general and division of criminal investigation on
the designation of critical infrastructure zones and the
investigation and identification of conveyances, leases and
leasehold interests within as defined by W.S.
19-13-501(a)(i), located up to five (5) miles of from
critical infrastructure zones as disclosed by the
recordings reported by county clerks in accordance with
W.S. 19-13-501 and 19-13-502.
19-13-105. Homeland security program.
(e) The office of homeland security may receive and
share criminal identification, intelligence and criminal
history information available to law enforcement agencies
for the purposes provided by W.S. 19-13-103.
19-13-501. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(i) "Conveyance" means as defined by W.S.
34-1-102 and includes conveyances of every instrument in
writing by which any interest in real property, surface
interests, mineral interests and pore space interests is
created, alienated, mortgaged, leased or assigned, or by
which the title to any real property may be affected in law
or in equity. "Conveyance" shall not include wills;
(iv) "Designated country or person" means:
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0097
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(A) A foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined to be a foreign adversary
by the United States secretary of commerce and specified in
15 C.F.R. 7.4(a) 15 C.F.R. 791.4(a); or
(vi) "Real property" means all interests in land
and appurtenances, including structures, affixed thereto,
and any intangible characteristic that contributes to the
fair market value thereof. "Real property" includes surface
interests, mineral interests and pore space interests.
19-13-502. Critical infrastructure zones; reporting
of conveyances; investigations; notification; rulemaking.
(c) Within fifteen (15) days after the a conveyance
is executed and completed recorded, the county clerk shall
report each the conveyance that involves any property
located within a critical infrastructure zone or that is
located not more than five (5) miles from a critical
infrastructure zone to the director and to the division of
criminal investigation.
(d) Upon receiving a report from a county clerk under
subsection (c) of this section, the director and the
division of criminal investigation shall determine whether
a conveyance is within a critical infrastructure zone or
located up to five (5) miles from a critical infrastructure
zone and, upon reasonable suspicion, investigate the
conveyance to determine if the conveyance involves a
designated country or person or if the conveyance poses a
threat to national or state security or to critical
infrastructure.
Section 2. W.S. 19-13-502(b) is repealed.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0097
ENROLLED ACT NO. 32, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
5